Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 30. Public Service

Executive Order No. 30-1
(No. 30-76) [Department of Bus, Rail, Waterways and Motor Carrier Services.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 30-2
(No. 56-81) [Transfer of Energy Office From Agency of Administration to Department of Public Service.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 30-3
(No. 09-94) [Declaration of Energy Emergency with Respect to Damaged PV20 Transmission Line.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 30-4
(No. 09-95) [Extension of Declaration of Energy Emergency with Respect to Damaged PV20 Transmission Line.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 30-5
(No. 08-98) [Working Group on Vermont’s Electricity Future.

Superseded by Executive Order 10-98 (codified as Executive Order No. 30-6), dated August 13, 1998.

Executive Order No. 30-6
(No. 10-98) [Working Group on Vermont’s Electricity Future.

Expired by its own terms, effective December 15, 1998.

Executive Order No. 30-7
(No. 15-03) [Statewide Telecommunications Advancement.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 08-06 (codified as Executive Order No. 30-9), dated November 4, 2006.

Executive Order No. 30-8
(No. 04-04) [Commission on Wind Energy Regulatory Policy.

Expired by its own terms, effective December 31, 2004.

Executive Order No. 30-9
(No. 08-06) [Statewide Telecommunications Advancement.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-50 (codified as Executive Order 10-09), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 30-10
(No. 10-12) [Governor’s Energy Generation Siting Policy Commission.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.